Louisiana, session 2026, HB886.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
7 Section 1. R.S. 56:325.5(D) is hereby enacted to read as follows:
8 §325.5. Commercial menhaden harvest reporting
9 * * *
10 D. Notwithstanding Paragraph (A)(3) of this Section or R.S. 56:301.4, any
11 report received by a legislative committee pursuant to the requirement in Subsection
12 B of this Section shall not be considered confidential.
13 Section 2. R.S. 56:325.5(A)(1)(c) is hereby repealed in its entirety.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 1 of 1
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.